Connecticut, session 2026, HB05275.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) For the purposes of this
section and section 31-72 of the general statutes, as amended by this act:
(1) "Construction contract" means any contract entered into on or
after October 1, 2026, for construction, renovation or rehabilitation in the
state, including any improvements to real property that are associated
with such construction, renovation or rehabilitation, or any subcontract
for construction, renovation or rehabilitation between an owner and a
contractor, a contractor and a subcontractor or between a subcontractor
and another subcontractor. "Construction contract" does not include (A)
any public works or other contract entered into with any agency or
department in the state, another state or a federal agency or department,
or (B) a home improvement contract for (i) the construction, renovation
or rehabilitation of an owner-occupied residence or the property where
HB5275 / File No. 91 1

HB5275 File No. 91
such residence is located, or (ii) the construction, renovation or
rehabilitation of a one-family or two-family dwelling unit or the
property where such dwelling unit is located, except when such contract
is for the construction of more than fifteen one-family or two-family
dwelling units at one project site;
(2) "Contractor" means any individual, firm, partnership,
corporation, association, company, organization or other business
entity, including, but not limited to, a construction manager, general or
prime contractor, joint venture or any combination thereof that has a
direct contractual relationship with an owner;
(3) "Employee" has the same meaning as provided in section 31-71a
of the general statutes;
(4) "Owner" has the same meaning as provided in section 42-158i of
the general statutes;
(5) "Subcontractor" means any individual, firm, partnership,
corporation, association, company, organization or other business entity
or any combination thereof that (A) does not have a direct contractual
relationship with an owner, and (B) (i) is a party to a construction
contract with a contractor, (ii) is a party to a construction contract with
another subcontractor that has a direct contractual relationship with a
contractor, or (iii) performs any portion of work at any tier within the
scope of a construction contract regardless of whether such
subcontractor has a direct contractual relationship with a contractor;
and
(6) "Wages" has the same meaning as provided in section 31-71a of
the general statutes.
(b) A contractor that enters into a construction contract shall be jointly
and severally liable for any unpaid wages due to an employee of a
subcontractor for such employee's performance of labor included within
the scope of the construction contract.
(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a contractor from including
HB5275 / File No. 91 2

HB5275 File No. 91
in any construction contract between such contractor and a
subcontractor a provision establishing a remedy for any liability created
by the nonpayment of wages by a subcontractor, provided such
provision does not diminish the right of an employee to bring an action
under section 31-72 of the general statutes, as amended by this act, and
does not waive or release any liability assigned to a contractor under
this section. No such provision to waive or release liability assigned to
the contractor under this section shall be enforceable.
Sec. 2. Section 31-72 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) When any employer fails to pay an employee wages in accordance
with the provisions of sections 31-71a to 31-71i, inclusive, or fails to
compensate an employee in accordance with section 31-76k or where an
employee or a labor organization representing an employee institutes
an action to enforce an arbitration award which requires an employer to
make an employee whole or to make payments to an employee welfare
fund, such employee or labor organization shall recover, in a civil action,
(1) twice the full amount of such wages, with costs and such reasonable
attorney's fees as may be allowed by the court, or (2) if the employer
establishes that the employer had a good faith belief that the
underpayment of wages was in compliance with law, the full amount of
such wages or compensation, with costs and such reasonable attorney's
fees as may be allowed by the court. Any agreement between an
employee and his or her employer for payment of wages other than as
specified in said sections shall be no defense to such action. The Labor
Commissioner may collect the full amount of any such unpaid wages,
payments due to an employee welfare fund or such arbitration award,
as well as interest calculated in accordance with the provisions of section
31-265 from the date the wages or payment should have been received,
had payment been made in a timely manner. In addition, the Labor
Commissioner may bring any legal action necessary to recover twice the
full amount of unpaid wages, payments due to an employee welfare
fund or arbitration award, and the employer shall be required to pay the
costs and such reasonable attorney's fees as may be allowed by the court.
HB5275 / File No. 91 3

HB5275 File No. 91
The commissioner shall distribute any wages, arbitration awards or
payments due to an employee welfare fund collected pursuant to this
section to the appropriate person.
(b) When a subcontractor fails to pay an employee wages for labor
performed within the scope of a construction contract entered into on or
after October 1, 2026, the employee, or a labor organization representing
the employee, may bring a civil action under this section against either
the subcontractor, the contractor or both the subcontractor and
contractor. Not less than thirty days prior to bringing a civil action
under this section, if a contractor is a party in such action, an employee
shall provide notice of an alleged violation by the subcontractor to such
contractor. Such notice shall describe the general nature of the alleged
violation. No employee shall be required to provide notice pursuant to
this subsection if such employee has previously given notice to a
contractor of either the same violation or a prior violation by the same
subcontractor. Any notice provided to a contractor pursuant to this
subsection shall not limit the liability of the contractor or preclude
subsequent amendments of an action brought under this section to
encompass additional employees employed by the subcontractor. For
purposes of this section, "construction contract", "contractor" and
"subcontractor" have the same meanings as provided in section 1 of this
100 act.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 31-72
LAB Joint Favorable
HB5275 / File No. 91 4

HB5275 File No. 91
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which makes contractors liable for unpaid wages owed to
employees of subcontractors that perform work on any portion of
certain construction contracts, does not result in any fiscal impact to the
state or municipalities.1
Section 2 allows an employee and other designated parties to bring
civil action against a contractor for unpaid wages. The court system
disposes of over 250,000 cases annually and the number of cases is not
anticipated to be great enough to need additional resources.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Current law, unchanged by the bill, allows employees to sue an employer for failure
to pay wages or fringe benefits, and may be awarded up to twice their unpaid wages,
related costs, and attorney's fees (CGS § 31-72).
HB5275 / File No. 91 5

HB5275 File No. 91
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5275
AN ACT CONCERNING A CONTRACTOR'S RESPONSIBILITY FOR
UNPAID WAGES ON A CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT.